Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2523
County personnel officer; appointment; qualifications.

The board of county commissioners shall appoint a county personnel officer who shall be a person experienced in the field of personnel administration and in known sympathy with the application of merit principles in public employment.

Laws 1974, LB 995, § 7.